Washington statutes.
RCW 41.12.020

Excluded cities—Repeal of local law—Effect.

If any of the cities or towns referred to in RCW 41.12.010 shall at any time repeal the charter provisions or other local acts of said cities or towns providing for civil service for police officers as referred to in RCW 41.12.010, in that event this chapter shall apply to all of such cities and towns which have at any time abolished civil service for members of the police department.

[ 2007 c 218 s 10; 1937 c 13 s 2; RRS s 9558a-2.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2007 c 218: See note following RCW 41.08.020.